Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-210
Ink stamp seal; contents.

(1) Each notary public, before performing any duties of his or her office, shall provide himself or herself with an official ink stamp seal on which shall appear the words State of Nebraska, General Notary or State of Nebraska, General Notarial, his or her name as commissioned, and the date of expiration of his or her commission.

(2) A notary public shall authenticate all of his or her official acts with such seal.

(3) A notary public whose commission was issued by the Secretary of State before September 1, 2007, is not required to purchase a new ink stamp seal in order to comply with this section until the notary public's commission expires. Upon renewal, each notary public shall have engraved on his or her official ink stamp seal all of the information required in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1969, c. 523, § 10, p. 2144;

Laws 1971, LB 88, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 315, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB382, § 1.